Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2199.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Dietary supplement" means the same as defined in the federal
food, drug and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. § 321, as in effect on July 1, 2025.
(2) "Early egg allergen introduction dietary supplement" means a
dietary supplement that is prescribed to an infant by a healthcare provider
and contains sufficient infant-safe, well-cooked egg protein to reduce the
risk of food allergies.
(3) "Early peanut allergen introduction dietary supplement" means a
dietary supplement that is prescribed to an infant by a healthcare provider
and contains sufficient infant-safe peanut protein to reduce the risk of food
allergies.
(4) "Healthcare provider" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 65-
16,127, and amendments thereto.
(5) "Infant" means a child who is under the age of one year.
(b) In the coverage for the next health plan coverage year
commencing on January 1, 2026, the Kansas state employees health care
commission may provide for the coverage for early egg allergen
introduction dietary supplements and early peanut allergen introduction
dietary supplements.
(c) (1) If the coverage authorized under subsection (b) is provided,
then pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 40-2249a, and amendments
thereto, on or before March 1, 2027, the Kansas state employees health
care commission shall submit to the president of the senate and to the
speaker of the house of representatives a report including the following
information pertaining to the coverage for early egg allergen introduction
dietary supplements and early peanut allergen introduction dietary
supplements provided during the plan year commencing on January 1,
2026, and ending on December 31, 2026:

HB 2199 2
(A) The impact that the coverage for early egg allergen introduction
dietary supplements and early peanut allergen introduction dietary
supplements authorized by subsection (b) has had on the state health care
benefits program;
(B) data on the utilization of coverage for early egg allergen
introduction dietary supplements and early peanut allergen introduction
dietary supplements by covered individuals and the cost of providing such
coverage; and
(C) a recommendation whether such coverage for early egg allergen
introduction dietary supplements and early peanut allergen introduction
dietary supplements should continue for the state health care benefits
program or whether additional utilization and cost data is required.
(2) Following receipt of the report required in paragraph (1), the
legislature may consider whether to require the coverage authorized by
subsection (b) to be included in any individual or group health insurance
policy, medical service plan, contract, hospital service corporation
contract, hospital and medical service corporation contract, fraternal
benefit society or health maintenance organization that provides coverage
for accident and health services and that is delivered, issued for delivery,
amended or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2028.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.